Illinois, session 104th, HB4271.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Township Code is amended by adding Section 5120-25 as follows: 6    (60 ILCS 1/120-25 new)7    Sec. 120-25. Exercise of park-related powers. A township 8that maintains public parks pursuant to this Article shall 9have, in addition to the rights, powers, and obligations 10granted to townships under this Code, all the rights, powers, 11and obligations of a park district organized under the Park 12District Code, except the authority to levy taxes pursuant to 13Article 5 of the Park District Code.